New York, session 2025-2026, S5309.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1108 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (o) to read as follows: 3 (o) A private air ambulance service that solicits membership 4 subscriptions, accepts membership applications, charges membership fees, 5 and provides air ambulance services to subscription members and desig- 6 nated members of their household is not an insurer if the private air 7 ambulance service: 8 (1) has a valid operating certificate issued by the department of 9 health; 10 (2) has non-profit status; 11 (3) has been in operation in New York for at least two years; 12 (4) provides in the membership materials a statement providing clear 13 disclosure to applicants and members that this is not insurance and 14 membership cannot be considered secondary insurance coverage or a 15 supplement to any insurance coverage; 16 (5) product is only offered by providers of the service; and 17 (6) has submitted evidence of its compliance with this section to the 18 superintendent pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the 19 department. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09621-01-5